New Jersey, session 222, S1896.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 26 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-26) is amended to read as follows: 26.  a.  The trust shall adopt rules and regulations requiring a local government unit which receives a loan or guarantee, through the New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program, for a project, to establish an affirmative action program for the hiring of minority workers in the performance of any construction contract for that project [and], to establish a program to provide opportunities for socially and economically disadvantaged contractors and vendors to supply materials and services for the contract, consistent with the provisions of the "Law Against Discrimination," P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.), and to establish a program to provide opportunities for businesses that are owned by members of the military, by veterans, or by the spouses thereof, to supply materials and services for the contract.  Not less than 10 percent of the amount of any contract for construction, materials, or services for a project shall be awarded to small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals as defined in the "Small Business Act," Pub.L.85-536 (15 U.S.C. s.631 et seq.), and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto provided, however, that [the] for projects funded, in whole or in part, with federal funds, the percentage of such contracts awarded to small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals shall equal the goal for participation set forth in section 644(g)(1)(A)(iv) of the "Small Business Act," Pub.L.85-536 (15 U.S.C. s.644).  For transportation financing program projects funded in whole with State funds, contracts for construction materials or services shall comply with the small business set aside regulations promulgated pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1983, c.482 (C.52:32-31). b.    The trust shall adopt rules and regulations requiring any entity, which receives a loan, grant, or guarantee for a project to pay not less than the prevailing wage rate to workers employed in the performance of any construction contract for that project, in accordance with the rate determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). (cf:  P.L. 2023, c.63, s.21) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.